Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 4 Public Officials’ Conduct and Lobbyist Disclosure
21-5-76.
Contingent fees for lobbying prohibited; unauthorized persons on the floor while the General Assembly is in session.

No person, firm, corporation, or association shall retain or employ a lobbyist for compensation contingent, in whole or in part, upon the passage or defeat of any legislative measure, upon the adoption or decision not to adopt any state agency rule or regulation, or upon the granting or awarding of any state contract. No lobbyist shall be employed for compensation contingent, in whole or in part, upon the passage or defeat of any legislation, upon the adoption or decision not to adopt any state agency rule or regulation, or upon the granting or awarding of any state contract.

It shall be unlawful for any person registered pursuant to the requirements of this article or for any other person, except as authorized by the rules of the House of Representatives or Senate, to be on the floor of either chamber of the General Assembly while the same is in session.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-76

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 23/HB 48; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 23/SB 17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 enactment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).